District of Columbia statutes.
42-3208

Parties may agree to alternate notice provisions; waiver.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed as preventing the parties to a lease, by agreement in writing, from substituting a longer or shorter notice to quit than is above provided or to waive all such notice.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1384, ch. 854, § 1236
1981 Ed., § 45-1408.
1973 Ed., § 45-908.